District of Columbia statutes.
2-810

Authorization of appropriations.

(a)

Authorization. —

Necessary amounts are authorized to be appropriated—

(1)

To enable the Mayor of the District of Columbia to provide additional municipal services in the District of Columbia during the inaugural period, including:

(A)

Employment of personal services without regard to Chapters 33 and 51 and subchapter III of Chapter 58 of Title 5 [of the U.S. Code];

(B)

Travel expenses of enforcement personnel, including sanitarians, from other jurisdictions;

(C)

The hiring of the means of transportation;

(D)

Meals for policemen, firemen, and other municipal employees;

(E)

The cost of removing and relocating streetcar loading platforms, construction, rent, maintenance, and expenses incident to the operation of temporary public comfort stations, first-aid stations, and information booths; and

(F)

Other incidental expenses in the discretion of the Mayor; and

(2)

To enable the Secretary of the Interior to provide meals for the members of the United States Park Police during the inaugural period.

(b)

Payment. —

Amounts appropriated under:

(1)

Subsection (a)(1) of this section are payable in the same way as other appropriations for the expenses of the District of Columbia; and

(2)

Subsection (a)(2) of this section are payable in the same way as other appropriations for the expenses of the Department of the Interior.

History

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1265, Pub. L. 105-225, § 510

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1060.

References in Text

“Chapters 33 and 51 and subchapter III of Chapter 58 of Title 5,” referred to in (a)(1)(A), are references to Title 5 of the U.S. Code.